Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-14] Immunity of panel members from
liability. No member of a design claim conciliation panel shall be liable
in damages for libel, slander, or other defamation of character of any party to
a design claim conciliation panel proceeding for any action taken or any
decision, conclusion, finding, or recommendation made by the member while
acting within the member's capacity as a member of a design claim conciliation
panel under this chapter. [L 2007, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next